en_US.aff
SET UTF-8


TRY ්ාෘුැූෑිීෙ

REP 27
REP න ණ
REP ණ න
REP ල ළ
REP ළ ල
REP ස ෂ
REP ෂ ස
REP ස ශ
REP ශ ස
REP ච ඡ
REP ඡ ච
REP බ භ
REP භ බ
REP ද ධ
REP ධ ද
REP ර් ්‍ර
REP ට ඨ
REP ඨ ට
REP ක ඛ
REP ඛ ක
REP ඩ ඪ
REP ඪ ඩ
REP ඉ ඊ
REP ඊ ඉ
REP ප ඵ
REP ඵ ප
REP කරන කර_න
REP දැක්වූ දැක්_වූ

COMPOUNDFLAG 9
COMPOUNDMIN 1
FLAG num
SFX 3 Y 3
SFX 3 ණ ම් ණ
SFX 3 ණ නු ණ
SFX 3 ණ නා ණ
SFX 2 Y 12
SFX 2 0 ය .
SFX 2 0 ේ .
SFX 2 0 යක් .
SFX 2 0 යෙන් .
SFX 2 0 යන් .
SFX 2 0 ෙ .
SFX 2 0 යන්ට .
SFX 2 0 ැයි .
SFX 2 0 ා .
SFX 2 0 ු .
SFX 2 0 ේය .
SFX 2 0 ෙමු .
SFX 4 Y 2
SFX 4 0 ට .
SFX 4 0 ගෙන් .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 ් .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 යා 0 .
SFX 8 Y 45
SFX 8 0 ව .
SFX 8 0 වත් .
SFX 8 0 වයි .
SFX 8 0 වක් .
SFX 8 0 වකි .
SFX 8 0 වකුත් .
SFX 8 0 වෝ .
SFX 8 0 වෝත් .
SFX 8 0 වෝයි .
SFX 8 0 වක .
SFX 8 0 වකත් .
SFX 8 0 වකයි .
SFX 8 0 වන් .
SFX 8 0 වනුත් .
SFX 8 0 වනුයි .
SFX 8 0 වට .
SFX 8 0 වටත් .
SFX 8 0 වටයි .
SFX 8 0 වකට .
SFX 8 0 වකටත් .
SFX 8 0 වකටයි .
SFX 8 0 වන්ට .
SFX 8 0 වන්ටත් .
SFX 8 0 වන්ටයි .
SFX 8 0 වගෙන් .
SFX 8 0 වගෙනුත් .
SFX 8 0 වගෙනි .
SFX 8 0 වකගෙන් . 
SFX 8 0 වකගෙනුත් .
SFX 8 0 වකගෙනි .
SFX 8 0 වන්ගෙන් .
SFX 8 0 වන්ගෙනුත් .
SFX 8 0 වන්ගෙනි .
SFX 8 0 වගේ .
SFX 8 0 වගේත් .
SFX 8 0 වගේයි .
SFX 8 0 වගෙත් .
SFX 8 0 වගෙයි .
SFX 8 0 වකගේ .
SFX 8 0 වකගේත් .
SFX 8 0 වකගේයි .
SFX 8 0 වන්ගේ . 
SFX 8 0 වන්ගේත් .
SFX 8 0 වන්ගේයි .
SFX 8 0 වනි .

SFX 9 Y 42
SFX 9 0 ත් .
SFX 9 0 යි .
SFX 9 0 ක් .
SFX 9 0 කි .
SFX 9 0 කුත් .
SFX 9 0 ක .
SFX 9 0 කත් .
SFX 9 0 කයි  .
SFX 9 0 ුනුත් .
SFX 9 0 ුනි  .
SFX 9 0 ට  .
SFX 9 0 ටත් . 
SFX 9 0 ටයි .
SFX 9 0 කට .
SFX 9 0 කටත් .
SFX 9 0 කටයි .
SFX 9 0 ුනට .
SFX 9 0 ුනටත් .
SFX 9 0 ුනටයි .
SFX 9 0 ගෙන් .
SFX 9 0 ගෙනුත් .
SFX 9 0 ගෙනි .
SFX 9 0 කගෙන් .
SFX 9 0 කගෙනුත්  .
SFX 9 0 කගෙනි .
SFX 9 0 ුන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 9 0 ුන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 9 0 ුන්ගෙනි . 
SFX 9 0 ගේ .
SFX 9 0 ගේත් .
SFX 9 0 ගේයි .
SFX 9 0 ගෙ .
SFX 9 0 ගෙත් .
SFX 9 0 ගෙයි .
SFX 9 0 කගේ .
SFX 9 0 කගේත් .
SFX 9 0 කගේයි .
SFX 9 0 ුන්ගේ  .
SFX 9 0  ුන්ගේත් .
SFX 9 0 ුන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 9 0  ුන්ගේයි  .
SFX 9 0 ුනි . 

SFX 10 Y 47
SFX 10 ි ී .
SFX 10 0 ය .
SFX 10 0 යත් .
SFX 10 0 යයි  .
SFX 10 0 යක් .
SFX 10 0 යකි .
SFX 10 0 යකුත් .
SFX 10 0 යෝ  .
SFX 10 0 යෝත් .
SFX 10 0 යෝයි  .
SFX 10 0 යක  .
SFX 10 0 යකත් . 
SFX 10 0 යකයි .
SFX 10 0 යන් .
SFX 10 0 යනුත් .
SFX 10 0 යනුයි .
SFX 10 0 යට .
SFX 10 0 යටත් .
SFX 10 0 යටයි .
SFX 10 0 යකට .
SFX 10 0 යකටත් .
SFX 10 0 යකටයි .
SFX 10 0 යන්ට .
SFX 10 0 යන්ටත්  .
SFX 10 0 යන්ටයි .
SFX 10 0 යගෙන් .
SFX 10 0 යගෙනුත්  .
SFX 10 0 යගෙනි . 
SFX 10 0 යකගෙන් .
SFX 10 0 යකගෙනුත් .
SFX 10 0 යකගෙනි .
SFX 10 0 යන්ගෙන් .
SFX 10 0 යන්ගෙනුත් .
SFX 10 0 යන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 10 0 යගේ .
SFX 10 0 යගේත් .
SFX 10 0 යගේයි .
SFX 10 0 යගෙ  .
SFX 10 0 යගෙත් .
SFX 10 0 යගෙයි   .
SFX 10 0 යකගේ  .
SFX 10 0 යකගේත් . 
SFX 10 0 යකගේයි  .
SFX 10 0 යන්ගේ . 
SFX 10 0 යන්ගේත් .
SFX 10 0 යන්ගේයි .
SFX 10 0 යනි .

SFX 11 Y 46 .	
SFX 11 0 ය .	
SFX 11 0 යත්  .	
SFX 11 0 යයි  .	
SFX 11 0 යක් .	
SFX 11 0 යකි .	
SFX 11 0 යකුත් .	
SFX 11 0 යෝ  .	
SFX 11 0 යෝත්  .	
SFX 11 0 යෝයි  .	
SFX 11 0 යක .	
SFX 11 0 යකත් .	
SFX 11 0 යකයි .	
SFX 11 0 යන්  .	
SFX 11 0 යනුත්  .	
SFX 11 0 යනුයි  .	
SFX 11 0 යට .	
SFX 11 0 යටත් .	
SFX 11 0 යටයි .	
SFX 11 0 යකට .	
SFX 11 0 යකටත් .	
SFX 11 0 යකටයි .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ට .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ටත් .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ටයි .	
SFX 11 0 යගෙන් .	
SFX 11 0 යගෙනුත් .	
SFX 11 0 යගෙනි .	
SFX 11 0 යකගෙන් .	
SFX 11 0 යකගෙනුත් .	
SFX 11 0 යකගෙනි .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ගෙන් .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ගෙනි .	
SFX 11 0 යගේ .	
SFX 11 0 යගේත් .	
SFX 11 0 යගේයි .	
SFX 11 0 යගෙ .	
SFX 11 0 යගෙත් .	
SFX 11 0 යගෙයි .	
SFX 11 0 යකගේ .	
SFX 11 0 යකගේත් .	
SFX 11 0 යකගේයි .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ගේ .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ගේත් .	
SFX 11 0 යන්ගේයි .	
SFX 11 0 යනි .	
	
SFX 12 Y 43		
SFX 12 0 ා .		
SFX 12 0 ාත්  .		
SFX 12 0 ායි  .	
SFX 12 0 ෙක් .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුත් .			
SFX 12 0 ලා  .		
SFX 12 0 ලාත්  .	
SFX 12 0 ලායි  .		
SFX 12 0  ෙකු .	
SFX 12 0  ෙකුයි .	
SFX 12 0 ාට .	
SFX 12 0 ාටත් .	
SFX 12 0 ාටයි .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 12 0 ලාට .	
SFX 12 0 ලාටත් .	
SFX 12 0 ලාටයි .	
SFX 12 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 12 0 ාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 12 0 ාගෙනි .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 12 0 ලාගෙන් .	
SFX 12 0 ලාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 12 0 ලාගෙනි .	
SFX 12 0 ාගේ .	
SFX 12 0 ාගේත් .	
SFX 12 0 ාගේයි .	
SFX 12 0 ාගෙ .	
SFX 12 0 ාගෙත් .	
SFX 12 0 ාගෙයි .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 12 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 12 0 ලාගේ .	
SFX 12 0 ලාගේත් .	
SFX 12 0 ලාගේයි .	
SFX 12 0 ේ .	

SFX 13 Y 47	
SFX 13 0 ා .	
SFX 13 0 ාත්  .	
SFX 13 0 ායි  .	
SFX 13 0 ෙක් .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලා  .	
SFX 13 0 ාලා  .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාණෙනි  .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාත්  .	
SFX 13 0 ාලාත්  .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලායි  .	
SFX 13 0 ාලායි  .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකු .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුයි .	
SFX 13 0 ාට .	
SFX 13 0 ාටත් .	
SFX 13 0 ාටයි .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාට .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාටත් .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාටයි .	
SFX 13 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 13 0 ාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 13 0 ාගෙනි .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාගෙන් .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාගෙනි .	
SFX 13 0 ාගේ .	
SFX 13 0 ාගේත් .	
SFX 13 0 ාගේයි .	
SFX 13 0 ාගෙ .	
SFX 13 0 ාගෙත් .	
SFX 13 0 ාගෙයි .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 13 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාගේ .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාගේත් .	
SFX 13 0 න්ලාගේයි .	
SFX 13 0 නි .	

SFX 14 Y 26	
SFX 14 0 ත්  .	
SFX 14 0 යි  .	
SFX 14 0 ලා  .	
SFX 14 0 ලාත්  .	
SFX 14 0 ලායි  .	
SFX 14 0 ට .	
SFX 14 0 ටත් .	
SFX 14 0 ටයි .	
SFX 14 0 ලාට .	
SFX 14 0 ලාටත් .	
SFX 14 0 ලාටයි .	
SFX 14 0 ගෙන් .	
SFX 14 0 ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 14 0 ගෙනි .	
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙන් .	
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 14 0 ලාගෙනි .	
SFX 14 0 ගේ .	
SFX 14 0 ගේත් .	
SFX 14 0 ගේයි .	
SFX 14 0 ගෙ .	
SFX 14 0 ගෙත් .	
SFX 14 0 ගෙයි .	
SFX 14 0 ලාගේ .	
SFX 14 0 ලාගේත් .	
SFX 14 0 ලාගේයි .	

SFX 15 Y 57	
SFX 15 0 වා .	
SFX 15 0 වාත්  .	
SFX 15 0 වායි  .	
SFX 15 0 වෙක් .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකි .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුත් .	
SFX 15 0 වෝ .	
SFX 15 0 වෝත්  .	
SFX 15 0 වෝයි  .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකු .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුයි .	
SFX 15 0 වකු .	
SFX 15 0 වකුයි .	
SFX 15 0 වකුත්  .	
SFX 15 0 වන්  .	
SFX 15 0 වනුත්  .	
SFX 15 0 වනුයි  .	
SFX 15 0 වාට .	
SFX 15 0 වාටත් .	
SFX 15 0 වාටයි .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුට .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුටත් .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුටයි .	
SFX 15 0 වකුට .	
SFX 15 0 වකුටත් .	
SFX 15 0 වකුටයි .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ට .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ටත් .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ටයි .	
SFX 15 0 වාගෙන් .	
SFX 15 0 වාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 15 0 වාගෙනි .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 15 0 වකුගෙන් .	
SFX 15 0 වකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 15 0 වකුගෙනි .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ගෙන් .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ගෙනි .	
SFX 15 0 වාගේ .	
SFX 15 0 වාගේත් .	
SFX 15 0 වාගේයි .	
SFX 15 0 වගෙ .	
SFX 15 0 වගෙත් .	
SFX 15 0 වගෙයි .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුගේ .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 15 0 වෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 15 0 වකුගේ .	
SFX 15 0 වකුගේත් .	
SFX 15 0 වකුගේයි .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ගේ .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ගේත් .	
SFX 15 0 වන්ගේයි .	
SFX 15 0 වනි  .	

SFX 16 Y 56	
SFX 16 0 ්  .	
SFX 16 0 ා  .	
SFX 16 0 ාත්  .	
SFX 16 0 ායි  .	
SFX 16 0 ෙක් .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකු .	
SFX 16 0 කු .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකි .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුත් .	
SFX 16 0 කුයි .	
SFX 16 0 කුත් .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්  .	
SFX 16 0 ුනුත්  .	
SFX 16 0 ුනි  .	
SFX 16 0 ාට .	
SFX 16 0 ාටත් .	
SFX 16 0 ාටයි .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුට .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුටත් .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුටයි .	
SFX 16 0 කුට .	
SFX 16 0 කුටත් .	
SFX 16 0 කුටයි .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්ට .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්ටත් .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්ටයි .	
SFX 16 0 ාගෙන් .	
SFX 16 0 ාගෙනුත් .	
SFX 16 0 ාගෙනි .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුගෙන් .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුගෙනි .	
SFX 16 0 කුගෙන් .	
SFX 16 0 කුගෙනුත් .	
SFX 16 0 කුගෙනි .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්ගෙන් .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්ගෙනුත් .	
SFX 16 0 ුන්ගෙනි .	
SFX 16 0 ාගේ .	
SFX 16 0 ාගේත් .	
SFX 16 0 ාගේයි .	
SFX 16 0 ාගෙ .	
SFX 16 0 ාගෙත් .	
SFX 16 0 ාගෙයි .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුගේ .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුගේත් .	
SFX 16 0 ෙකුගේයි .	
SFX 16 0 කුගේ .	
SFX 16 0 කුගේත් .	
SFX 16 0 කුගේයි .	
SFX 16 0  ුන්ගේ .	
SFX 16 0  ුන්ගේත් .	
SFX 16 0  ුන්ගේයි .	
SFX 16 0 ුනි .	
SFX 17 Y 3	
SFX 17 0 ්ලු  .	
SFX 17 0 ්ලුත්  .	
SFX 17 0 ්ලුයි  .	
