en_US.dic
අංක/2
අම්මා/4
නංගි/4
මල්ලි/4
අයියා/4
තාත්තා/4
මාමා/4
පුංචි/4
නැන්දා/4
බල්ලා/4
පූසා/4
ලේනා/4,6
කාක්කා/4
ළමයා/4,6
මල/5
හෙළ/9
බස/9
රත/7,5
අධ්‍යක්ෂිකා/8
අප්සරා/8
අපේක්ෂිකා/8
අභිරූපිකා/8	
අභිසාරිකා/8	
අඹු/8	
ආර්යා/8	
ඉස්තිරියා/8	
උපදේශිකා/8	
උපාසිකා/8	
උම්මත්තිකා/8
ඒකභාර්යා/8	
කන්‍යා/8	
ක්‍රීඩිකා/8	
කාන්තා/8	
කුමාරිකා/8	
කුලංගනා/8	
ගණිකා/8	
ගායිකා/8	
ගුරුමාතා/8
ජලාංගනා/8	
දිව්‍යාංගනා/8	
දේවතා/8	
නාට්‍යාංගනා/8	
නිරූපිකා/8	
පර්යේෂිකා/8	
පරිවර්තිකා/8	
ප්‍රකාශිකා/8	
ප්‍රියා/8	
බහුභාර්යා/8	
භාර්යා/8	
මාතා/8	
රචිකා/8	
ලේඛිකා/8	
ව්‍යාපාරිකා/8	
වින්නඹු/8	
වෛශ්‍යා/8	
ශිෂ්‍යා/8	
සිද්ධාංගනා/8	
සුරදූතිකා/8	
සුරංගනා/8	
උපස්ථායිකා/8   
අධ්‍යක්‍ෂිකා/8	
කතානායිකා/8	
බාලදක්ෂිකා/8	
අපේක්‍ෂිකා/8	
දේවමාතා/8
කත/9	
අඟන/9	
කුලඟන/9	
ගවඟන/9	
නළඟන/9	
පුරඟන/9	
දෙවඟන/9	
හසඟන/9	
මිහිකත/9	
වෙසඟන/9	
ළඳ/9	
මව/9	
බිසව/9
අධිපතිනි/10
අම්මණ්ඩි/10
අවාසනාවන්ති/10
ආදරවන්ති/10
ඇමතිනි/10
ඉකිණි/10	
එතුමි/10
කලාකාරිනි/10
කිකිළි/10
කිරිල්ලි/10
කුමාරි/10
ගර්භණි/10
ගුරුතුමි/10
ගෘහපතිනි/10
ජනපතිනි/10
ඥාතිවරි/10
තැනැත්ති/10
දාසි/10
දුවණි/10
දේවතාවි/10
ධර්මචාරිනි/10
නාකිච්චි/10	
නියෝජිතවරි/10
පංගුකාරි/10
පැටික්කි/10
පින්වති/10
පිස්සි/10
පෙම්වති/10
බැළලි/10
මන්ත්‍රිනි/10
මායාකාරි/10
මෙහෙකාරි/10
යක්ෂණි/10
යෞවනි/10
ලේකම්වරි/10
වැඩකාරි/10
විකුණන්නි/10
විනිශ්චයකාරවරි/10
ශෝභිනි/10
සරස්වති/10
ස්ත්‍රීවාදිනි/10
සිරකාරි/10
සුරතලි/10
සොහොයුරි/10
හිඟන්නි/10
හිමිකාරි/10
ළමිස්සි/10
ඇතිනි/11	
උවැසි/11	
කිවිඳි/11	
කෙකිනි/11	
කෙවිලි/11	
ගෘහණි/11	
ගැබිනි/11	
ගැහැනි/11	
ගෑනි/11	
ගිරවි/11	
ගෙවිලි/11	
ථෙරි/11	
දැරි/11	
නිළි/11	
බැමිණි/11	
බිරි/11	
මනාලි/11	
මැකිණි/11	
මැතිනි/11	
මිත්තණි/11	
මෙනෙවි/11	
මෙහෙණි/11	
යෙහෙළි/11	
ලි/11	
ලේලි/11	
වහලි/11	
විරහිනි/11	
සිසුවි/11	
හෙදි/11	
අක්ක/12	
අත්තම්ම/12	
අත්ත/12	
අප්ප/12	
අම්ම/12	
අයිය/12	
ආත්තම්ම/12	
ආත්ත/12	
ආත/12	
ආය/12	
කුඩප්ප/12	
කුඩම්ම/12	
තාත්ත/12	
නැන්දම්ම/12	
නැන්ද/12	
නෑන/12	
පප්ප/12	
බාප්ප/12	
බාලම්ම/12	
බෑණ/12	
බෑන/12	
මම්ම/12	
මහප්ප/12	
මහම්ම/12	
මාම/12	
මායිය/12	
මුත්ත/12	
සීය/12	
අපුච්ච/12	
අගමැතිතුම/13	
අගවිනිසුරුතුම/13	
අග්‍රවිනිශ්චයකාරතුම/13	
අදිකාරම්තුම/13	
අධ්‍යක්ෂතුම/13	
අධිපතිතුම/13	
ආචාර්යතුම/13	
ආණ්ඩුකාරතුම/13	
ආදිපාදතුම/13	
ඇදුරුතුම/13	
ඇමතිතුම/13	
උතුම/13	
එතුම/13	
කථානායකතුම/13	
ගුරුතුම/13	
ජෙනරාල්තුම/13	
ජනාධිපතිතුම/13	
තුම/13	
නායකතුම/13	
පඬිතුම/13	
පියතුම/13	
පූජකතුම/13	
බිෂොප්තුම/13	
මන්ත්‍රීතුම/13	
මැතිතුම/13	
මුදලිතුම/13	
මෙතුම/13	
රජතුම/13	
විද්‍යාලයාධිපතිතුම/13	
විනිශ්චයකාරතුම/13	
විපක්ෂනායකතුම/13	
හමුදාපතිතුම/13	
අගසවු/14	
අග්‍රාමාත්‍ය/14	
අණකරු/14	
අධ්‍යක්ෂක/14	
අනුනායක/14	
අනුශාසක/14	
අපේක්ෂක/14	
අයකැමි/14	
ආච්චි/14	
ආණ්ඩුකාරතැන/14	
ඇමති/14	
උපදිසාපති/14	
උපනායක/14	
ඒකාධිපති/14	
කුඩප්පච්චි/14	
කොන්දොස්තර/14	
ගුරුන්නාන්සේ/14	
ජනාධිපති/14	
තානාපති/14	
දිසාපති/14	
ධනපති/14	
නංගී/14	
නගරාධිපති/14	
නෑනණ්ඩි/14	
නීතිපති/14	
පරිවර්තක/14	
පරීක්ෂක/14	
ප්‍රධානාචාර්ය/14	
පීඨාධිපති/14	
භාණ්ඩාගාරික/14	
මල්ලි/14	
මහඇමති/14	
මිනිබිරී/14	
මුත්තණ්ඩි/14	
මුදලි/14	
ලේලි/14	
ශාලාධිපති/14	
ස්ථවිර/14	
සේනාධිපති/14	
රාල/14	
දුක්ගන්නාරාල/14	
භික්ෂූන්වහන්සේ/14	
ස්වාමින්වහන්සේ/14	
හාම්පුතා/14	
රාලහාමි/14	
පුතා/14	
මුණුබුරා/14	
අතදරු/15	
අපනයනකරු/15	
අයදුම්කරු/15	
අලුකුත්තේරු/15	
ආධාරකරු/15	
ඇන්ගෝලියානු/15	
ඇමෙරිකානු/15	
ඉතියෝපියානු/15	
ඉපැයුම්කරු/15	
උපවාසකරු/15	
එස්තෝනියානු/15	
ඔටු/15	
කතාකරු/15	
කම්හල්කරු/15	
කලාකරු/15	
කැපකරු/15	
කිතුනු/15	
කුඹල්කරු/15	
කෙටිකතාකරු/15	
කොලු/15	
චෙකොස්ලොවැකියානු/15	
ණයකරු/15	
තාරා/15	
දරු/15	
දෙටු/15	
නළු/15	
නිවැරදිකරු/15	
පණු/15	
පුතණු/15	
බල්ගේරියානු/15	
මකුළු/15	
මැලේසියානු/15	
යහළු/15	
රැකුම්කරු/15	
වගාකරු/15	
වරදකරු/15	
විනිසුරු/15	
ශුභාරංචිකරු/15	
ස්ලොවැකියානු/15	
සැපයුම්කරු/15	
සිනමාකරු/15	
සිසුදරු/15	
සොල්දාදු/15	
හාමුදුරු/15	
හීරළු/15	
ළදරු/15	
ඇත/16	
උගත/16	
කැනහිල/16	
කිඹුල/16	
කුඹල/16	
කුලවත/16	
කුළුමීම/16	
කොක/16	
ගුණවත/16	
ගොන/16	
ගෝන/16	
ජගත/16	
තල්මස/16	
තිරිසන/16	
දඬුලේන/16	
දුප්පත/16	
ධනවත/16	
නිකම/16	
නූගත/16	
පිංවත/16	
පින්වත/16	
පුත/16	
පෙම්වත/16	
පොහොසත/16	
පෝසත/16	
බබ/16	
බලවත/16	
බළල/16	
බැතිමත/16	
බීමත/16	
බුද්ධිමත/16	
භවත/16	
මයින/16	
මිනිස/16	
මීම/16	
යක/16	
යුෂ්මත/16	
රසවත/16	
වංශවත/16	
වවුල/16	
වැඩිමල/16	
වියත/16	
ශක්තිමත/16	
සමත/16	
සැවුල/16	
සුරතල/16	
හිවල/16	
හිවල/17
හුරතල/17
සුරතල/17
සැවුල/17
වැඩිමල/17
වවුල/17
වහල/17
රංකුඹල/17
බළල/17
